District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Restricting Egregious Scalping Against Live Entertainment (RESALE)
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new chapter designation to read as
follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“55. Sale and Resale of Live Event Tickets.”.
(b) A new Chapter 55 is added to read as follows:
“Chapter 55.
“Sale and Resale of Live Event Tickets.
“28-5501. Definitions.
“28-5502. Ticket disclosure and refund requirements.
“28-5503. Prohibition on the sale or resale of speculative tickets.
“28-5504. Transferability of tickets.
“28-5505. Requirement of reasonable technology for a ticket issuer and secondary ticket
exchange.
“28-5506. Requirements for resale of tickets.
“28-5507. Rules.
“28-5508. Penalties and enforcement.
“28-5509. Prohibition on surveillance-based price discrimination.
“§ 28-5501. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
“(1) “Department” means the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection.
“(2) “Resale” means the second or subsequent sale of a ticket by any method,
including in-person transactions, telephone, mail, e-mail, facsimile, or electronic means through
a website or mobile application.
“(3) “Reseller” means a person engaged in the resale of tickets.
“(4) “Secondary ticket exchange” means an electronic marketplace that enables a
person to sell, purchase, and resell tickets.
“(5) “Speculative ticket” means a ticket that is not in the actual or constructive
possession of a reseller at the time of listing, sale, resale, or advertisement, including tickets that
are not owned by the reseller and tickets that are under contract to be transferred to the reseller.
“(6) “Ticket” means any form of physical, electronic, or other evidence that grants
the possessor of the evidence license to enter a place of entertainment for one or more events,
including live concerts, theatrical performances, shows, or similarly scheduled live activities, at a
specified date and time; provided, that the event is not a sporting event organized by a
professional or intercollegiate sports team located in the District or professional athletic
association with an event located in the District; provided further, that the event is not a motion
picture screening.
“(7) “Ticket issuer” means a person or their agent who issues tickets for initial
sale, including musicians, venues, promoters, theater companies, and marketplaces for initial
purchases.
“§ 28-5502. Ticket disclosure and refund requirements.
“(a) The listing for a ticket and each step of a transaction to purchase a ticket shall clearly
and conspicuously disclose:
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) The total price of the ticket, including all fees and taxes other than shipping
costs that are not determinable at a step in the transaction;
“(2) An itemized listing of all charges that comprise the total price of the ticket,
including all fees and taxes; and
“(3) The seat number, zone, and section, to the extent applicable to the seat and
venue.
“(b)(1) The total price of a ticket disclosed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may
be increased in a noninitial step of a transaction by the amount of reasonable shipping costs for
physically delivered tickets.
“(2) The shipping costs allowed under paragraph (1) of this subsection may vary
with the consumer’s location relative to the shipment’s location of origin and the delivery
method selected by the consumer.
“(3) The total price of the ticket, including all fees, taxes, and shipping costs, shall
be clearly and conspicuously disclosed prior to final purchase of the ticket.
“(c)(1) A ticket issuer, secondary ticket exchange, or reseller directly engaged in a
transaction with a consumer shall provide a full refund, including all fees and taxes, if:
“(A) The ticket is counterfeit;
“(B) The event is canceled; or
“(C) The ticket does not conform to the description provided at the time of
purchase.
“(2) Refunds shall be issued within 10 days of the event’s cancellation or
discovery of non-conformance.
“(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, a nonprofit
corporation organized under Chapter 4 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Official Code shall
not be required to provide a refund if a consumer elects to donate the cost of their ticket.
“§ 28-5503. Prohibition on the sale or resale of speculative tickets.
“A reseller or a secondary ticket exchange shall not sell, resell, or offer to sell or resell
speculative tickets.
“§ 28-5504. Transferability of tickets.
“(a) A ticket issuer shall not restrict the transferability of a ticket sold unless the terms
and conditions on transferability are clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the consumer prior to
purchase and the consumer acknowledges receipt of such disclosure prior to purchase.
“(b) A ticket issuer may, subject to applicable District or federal law:
“(1) Maintain and enforce policies and conditions or requirements for ticket
purchase with respect to conduct, behavior, public health and safety, or age at the venue or event;
and
“(2) Establish limits on the quantity of tickets that may be purchased.
“§ 28-5505. Requirement of reasonable technology for a ticket issuer and secondary
ticket exchange.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“A ticket issuer and secondary ticket exchange, to the extent applicable and under the
totality of the circumstances, shall implement and maintain reasonable technology to prevent any
machine, device, computer program, or computer software, with or without human assistance,
from bypassing security measures or access control systems designed to limit the number of
tickets that can be purchased by a person on a primary or secondary ticket exchange.
“§ 28-5506. Requirements for resale of tickets.
“(a) A secondary ticket exchange shall, prior to a ticket being resold or offered to be
resold:
“(1) Verify that the reseller meets all licensure and bonding requirements
established in § 47-2890.02; and
“(2) Disclose the original purchase price of the ticket, including all fees and taxes
in connection with the initial purchase price of the ticket.
“(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a reseller or secondary ticket
exchange shall not sell or offer to sell a ticket that exceeds the total price of the initial ticket,
including all fees and taxes in connection with the initial ticket, plus up to 10% of the total price
of the initial ticket, including all fees and taxes in connection with the initial ticket.
“(c) A secondary ticket exchange may charge a fee for the service of providing a
marketplace for the resale of a ticket, which may be in addition to any fees described in
subsection (b) of this section; provided, that the fee shall not exceed 10% of the total price of the
initial ticket, including all fees and taxes in connection with the initial ticket.
“§ 28-5507. Rules.
“(a) The Mayor, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., shall issue rules to implement the provisions
of this chapter.
“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor may adjust the price and
fee restrictions imposed in § 28-5506(b) and (c) by rulemaking no earlier than January 1, 2028;
except, that the Mayor shall not:
“(1) Restrict the sale or offering for sale of a ticket below the total price of the
initial ticket, including all fees and taxes in connection with the initial ticket, or more than 20%
above the total price of the initial ticket, including all fees and taxes in connection with the initial
ticket; or
“(2) Reduce a fee that a secondary ticket exchange may charge for the service of
providing a marketplace for the resale of a ticket to below 5% or more than 20% of the total
price of the initial ticket, including all fees and taxes in connection with the initial ticket.
“(c) Proposed rules issued pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Council for a
45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays and days of Council
recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by
resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.
“§ 28-5508. Penalties and enforcement.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) A violation of this chapter shall be a Class 2 civil infraction and subject to fines
pursuant to section 3201 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16
DCMR § 3201).
“(b) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter shall be an unlawful trade
practice under § 28-3904.
“(c) The civil penalty imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be in
addition to the remedies available to the Attorney General pursuant to § 28-3909.
“§ 28-5509. Prohibition on surveillance-based price discrimination.
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a ticket issuer, reseller, or
secondary ticket exchange shall not use personally identifiable information collected through
electronic surveillance technology, technological methods, systems, or tools, including sensors,
cameras, device tracking, biometric monitoring, or other forms of observation or data collection
capable of gathering personally identifiable information about a consumer’s behavior,
characteristics, location, or other personal attributes, whether in physical or digital environments,
to set a price, fee, or discount for a ticket covered under this chapter.
“(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “personally identifiable information”
means information that can be used to distinguish or trace an individual’s identity, either alone or
when combined with other personal or identifying information that is linked or linkable to a
specific individual.
“(c)(1) The prohibition described in subsection (a) of this section shall not apply where a
reduction in the price or fees for a ticket covered under this chapter is:
“(A) Set based on publicly available eligibility criteria that any consumer
can satisfy on equal terms, including, voluntarily:
“(i) Signing up for a mailing list;
“(ii) Enrolling in a loyalty, membership, or rewards program;
“(iii) Registering for promotional communications; or
“(iv) Participating in a promotional event;
“(B) Provided to members of a broadly defined group, such as teachers,
active or retired military, senior citizens, students, members of a loyalty or membership program,
or group purchasers, so long as consumers voluntarily and knowingly provide information
sufficient to identify their membership in such group, including presentation of a student or
military identification card; or
“(C) Provided to recipients of a publicly established need-based program.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, any reduction in the price
or fees pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection for a ticket covered under this chapter shall
be:
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) Specified in terms and eligibility criteria that are clearly and
conspicuously disclosed; and
“(B) Provided to a consumer without the use of personally identifiable
information other than the use of personally identifiable information permitted under this
subsection.
“(d) The prohibition in subsection (a) of this section shall not prohibit the use of location
data to determine jurisdiction specific requirements for offering or providing consumers
with a ticket covered under this chapter, including to calculate taxes.”.
Sec. 3. Subchapter IV of Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code
is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new designation for part H to read as
follows:
“Part H.
“Ticket Resellers and Secondary Ticket Exchanges.
“47-2890.01. Definitions.
“47-2890.02. Ticket resellers.
“47-2890.03. Secondary ticket exchanges.
“47-2890.04. Reporting requirements.
“47-2890.05. Penalties and enforcement.”.
(b) A new part H is added to read as follows:
“Part H.
“Ticket Resellers and Secondary Ticket Exchanges.
“§ 47-2890.01. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this chapter, terms shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 28-
5501.
“§ 47-2890.02. Ticket resellers.
“(a)(1) No reseller that posts 50 or more ticket resale listings in a year shall operate in the
District without obtaining a license from the Department.
“(2) If a reseller lists a single ticket for resale across multiple secondary ticket
exchange platforms, the total number of listings for the ticket shall count toward the threshold
provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
“(b) An applicant for licensure shall provide the following information to the
Department:
“(1) Their full legal name and any aliases or usernames used in the resale of
tickets;
“(2) Their contact information, including a physical street address, email address,
and phone number;
“(3) All associated entities involved in the resale of tickets;
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) Proof of current surety bond as required by subsection (d) of this section; and
“(5) Any additional information required by the Department.
“(c) All entities under common ownership or control of a person shall be considered one
reseller for the purposes of the license requirements imposed under this section.
“(d)(1) A reseller that lists 50 or more tickets for resale in a year shall maintain a surety
bond of $25,000 to ensure compensation to consumers in cases where the reseller fails to deliver
purchased tickets or engages in fraudulent activities.
“(2) The surety bond shall cover compensation for lost funds by the consumer,
including travel expenses incurred by the consumer if the reseller fails to deliver the purchased
tickets.
“(3) The Department may adjust the surety bond requirements by rulemaking.
“§ 47-2890.03. Secondary ticket exchanges.
“A secondary ticket exchange shall obtain a basic business license to operate in the
District in accordance with § 47-2851.02.
“§ 47-2890.04. Reporting requirements.
“(a) The Department shall maintain a list of licensed resellers and make the list available
to the public via the Department’s website. The list shall:
“(1) Include the legal name, aliases, and associated entities of all registered
resellers;
“(2) Be updated at least quarterly; and
“(3) Include information on any violations of this part and Chapter 55 of Title 28
of the District of Columbia Official Code within the past 5 years.
“(b) A licensed reseller shall retain for 3 years:
“(1) The total number of tickets resold by the licensed reseller;
“(2) The original purchase price of each ticket purchased by the licensed reseller
within the previous year; and
“(3) The final resale price of each ticket resold by the licensed reseller.
“(c) A secondary ticket exchange shall:
“(1) Maintain records for 3 years of all licensed resellers and all tickets resales in
the District on its platform for inspection and upon request by the Department at least annually,
including:
“(A) The total number of tickets resold by a licensed reseller on its
platform;
“(B) The original purchase price of each ticket resold by a licensed
reseller; and
“(C) The final resale price of each ticket resold by a licensed reseller; and
“(2) Report any unlicensed or non-compliant resellers that sell, offer to sale, or
list tickets to an event being held in the District to the Department.
“§ 47-2890.05. Penalties and enforcement.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) The Department may suspend, revoke, or deny the license of any secondary ticket
exchange or reseller found to be in violation of this part and Chapter 55 of Title 28 of the District
of Columbia Official Code.
“(b) Failure to comply with the requirements of this part shall be an unlawful trade
practice under § 28-3904.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of January 1, 2027.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
8